District of Columbia statutes.
47-4638

2323 Pennsylvania Avenue, S.E., redevelopment project.

The tax imposed by Chapter 8 of this title with respect to the real property previously described as Lots 19, 20, 54, 802, 803, 810, and 811, Square 5560, and currently described as Lot 0055, Square 5560, and any improvements thereto, shall be abated for 10 years, beginning October 1, 2011, to the extent that it exceeds the amount of the tax imposed on the real property for tax year 2009.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-291, § 2(b), 57 DCR 11508

Editor's Notes

Section 3 of D.C. Law 18-291 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. This act shall apply upon the inclusion of it fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.”

Section 713 of D.C. Law 18-370 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 18-291.